Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Chapter 26. Aquaculture Advisory Board.

§ 3.2-2600.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Aquaculture”
means the propagation, rearing, enhancement, and harvest of aquatic organisms in controlled or selected environments, conducted in marine, estuarine, brackish, or fresh water.

“Aquaculture facility”
means any land, structure, or other appurtenance that is used for aquaculture, including any laboratory, hatchery, pond, raceway, pen, cage, incubator, or other equipment used in aquaculture.

“Aquatic organism”
means any species or hybrid of aquatic animal or plant, including fish, shellfish, marine fish, and marine organisms as those terms are defined by §

28.2-100

.

History.

1992, c. 643, § 3.1-73.6; 2008, c. 860.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

“Aquaculture.” —

Aquaculture not an agricultural operation under the Virginia Right to Farm Act. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Brenda L. Pogge, Member, House of Delegates, 11-127, 2012 Va. AG LEXIS 11 (3/9/12).

§ 3.2-2601.
Powers and duties of Commissioner.

The Commissioner shall have the following powers and duties:

To provide information and assistance in obtaining permits relating to aquacultural activities;

To promote aquaculture including encouraging investment in aquaculture facilities to expand production, processing capacity, and marketing;

To work with appropriate state and federal agencies to review, develop, and implement policies and procedures to facilitate aquacultural development;

To consult with and assist aquaculture industry groups, aquaculture associations, and academic institutions to develop, maintain, and expand the aquaculture industry; and

To develop, support, and implement policies beneficial to Virginia aquaculture.

History.

1992, c. 643, § 3.1-73.7; 2001, c. 320; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-2602.
Aquaculture Advisory Board; composition and appointment of members.

The Aquaculture Advisory Board is established as an advisory board in the executive branch of state government. The Aquaculture Advisory Board shall advise the Commissioner on policy matters related to aquaculture.

The Governor shall appoint the Aquaculture Advisory Board, which shall be composed of seven members who are representative of the interests of the aquaculture industry.The Board shall meet at the call of the Commissioner.

History.

1992, c. 643, § 3.1-73.8; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-2603.
Aquaculture Advisory Board membership terms; compensation.

The terms for appointments to the Aquaculture Advisory Board shall be for four years. Appointments to fill vacancies shall be for the unexpired term.

Members of the Aquaculture Advisory Board shall receive no compensation for their services but shall receive reimbursement for actual expenses.

History.

1992, c. 643, § 3.1-73.8; 2008, c. 860; 2022, cc. 576, 577.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 576 and 577 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “four” for “three” and substituted “shall be for the unexpired term” for “shall be made to fill unexpired terms.”